Utah statutes.
76-5-105.   Mayhem.
(1)  Every person who unlawfully and intentionally deprives a human being of a
member of his body, or disables or renders it useless, or who cuts out or
disables the tongue, puts out an eye, or slits the nose, ear, or lip, is
guilty of mayhem.
(2)  Mayhem is a felony of the second degree.
